Hawaii, session 2026, HB2019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that family-child interaction learning programs provide children from birth to age five with engaging, literacy-rich early learning environments that foster social and emotional development and support school readiness.  Family-child interaction learning programs include two main components: high-quality early childhood learning and parent education, which equips parents and caregivers with the knowledge and skills to support their children's education and healthy family dynamics. The legislature further finds that family-child interaction learning programs promote positive childhood experiences, which are strongly linked to better outcomes across the child's lifetime.  Individuals who reported having positive childhood experiences had better adult physical health, were less likely to report adult depression or mental health issues, were less likely to engage in substance use and delinquent behavior and had healthier family dynamics. The legislature also finds that family-child interaction learning programs are uniquely positioned to improve early detection of developmental delays, expand access to infant and early childhood mental health services, and connect families with a wide variety of social services. Moreover, the legislature finds that proposed cuts to federal funding that has historically supported family-child interaction learning programs would reduce the number of these programs from sixty-four to three.  This reduction would significantly affect local children and families and result in the loss of nearly one hundred twenty early childhood educator positions. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to sustain the number of family-child interaction learning programs in the State by appropriating funds to the executive office on early learning to support family-child interaction learning programs. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the executive office on early learning to administer funding for family-child interaction learning programs. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the executive office on early learning for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  For purposes of this Act, the executive office on early learning may contract with third-party providers of family-child interaction learning programs and may collaborate with the counties to administer funding for family-child interaction learning programs. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________